District of Columbia statutes.
46-101

Enumerated.

Notwithstanding any rule of common or other law to the contrary in effect on July 22, 1976, the age of majority in the District of Columbia shall be 18 years of age, except that this chapter shall not affect any common-law or statutory right to child support.

History

July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 2, 23 DCR 1177

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-751.01 and § 38-201.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-401.
1973 Ed., § 21-101 note.